Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1331.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 340A.412, subdivision 10, is amended to read: Subd. 10. Employment of minors. No person under 18 years of age may deleted text begin serve ordeleted text end sell intoxicating liquor in a retail deleted text begin intoxicating liquordeleted text end establishmentnew text begin that has an off-sale intoxicating liquor licensenew text end .new text begin A person 17 years of age may serve or sell intoxicating liquor in a retail establishment that has an on-sale intoxicating liquor license.new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end